District of Columbia statutes.
42-2602

Deposits to credit of Fund.

There shall be deposited to the credit of the Fund such amounts as may be appropriated pursuant to this subchapter; grants and gifts from public and private sources to the Fund or to the District of Columbia for the purposes of the Fund; repayments of principal and any interest on loans provided from the Fund; proceeds realized from the liquidation of any security interests held by the District of Columbia under the terms of any assistance provided from the Fund; interest earned from the deposit or investment of monies of the Fund; repayments of principal and any interest on loans provided under the District of Columbia Government Employer-Assisted Housing Program; and all other revenues, receipts and fees of whatever nature derived from the operation of the Fund.

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-103, § 3, 25 DCR 1977
June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-118, § 8(b), 39 DCR 3189
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1101, 44 DCR 7378
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-96, § 9(b), 47 DCR 1081
1981 Ed., § 45-2202.
1973 Ed., § 45-1802.
D.C. Law 13-96 inserted “repayments of principal and any interest on loans provided under the District of Columbia Government Employer-Assisted Housing Program;” following “interest earned from the deposit or investment of monies of the Fund;”.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 9(b) of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-188, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10407).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 9(b) of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-258, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1124).

Repeal of Law 9-118

Section 1101 of D.C. Law 12-60 repealed the District of Columbia Employer-Assisted Housing Act of 1992, D.C. Law 9-118.

Because of the enactment of subchapter II of this chapter by D.C. Law 12-266, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter”.

Section 11 of D.C. Law 13-96 provided: “This act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.”